Wyoming, session 2025, SF0130.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 1-1-120(a) and (b) is amended to
read:
1-1-120. Persons rendering emergency assistance
exempt from civil liability.
(a) Any person licensed as a physician and surgeon
under the laws of the state of Wyoming, or any other
person, who in good faith renders emergency care or
assistance, including assistance for a mental health
crisis, without compensation at the place of an emergency,
or accident or mental health crisis, is not liable for any
civil damages for acts or omissions in good faith.
(b) Persons or organizations operating volunteer
ambulances or rescue vehicles supported by public or
private funds, staffed by unpaid volunteers, and which make
no charge, or charge an incidental service or user fee, for
services rendered during medical emergencies or mental
health crises, and the unpaid volunteers who staff
ambulances and rescue vehicles are not liable for any civil
damages for acts or omissions in good faith in furnishing
emergency medical services or services during mental health
crises. This immunity does not apply to acts or omissions
constituting gross negligence or willful or wanton
misconduct. For purposes of this section, "unpaid
volunteers" means persons who either receive incidental
remuneration on a per call basis or receive no more than
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0130
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) annually for volunteer
ambulance and rescue activities, including mental health
services or services provided during a suicidal
intervention. The immunity provided by this subsection
shall extend to a physician while serving in his capacity
as medical director of any ambulance service, to hospitals
and hospital employees for activities directly related to
providing clinical training as part of an emergency medical
service class approved by the department of health, and to
students while participating in emergency medical services
or mental health services training approved by the
department of health. If an unpaid volunteer's, medical
director's, hospital's or trainee's acts or omissions are
subject to the provisions of the Wyoming Governmental
Claims Act, immunity under this section is waived to the
extent of the maximum liability provided under W.S.
1-39-118.
2

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0130
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
3